Idaho, session 2025, H0477.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Foster and Assistance Payments Program the following amounts to be expended
for trustee and benefit payments from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of extended foster care ser-
vices:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund $222,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 197,600
TOTAL $420,500
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.